Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202283-1225
School district; provide transition services; enumerated.

Each school district shall provide transition services for each student with a developmental disability no later than when the student reaches fourteen years of age and until the student graduates from a special education program or no longer meets the definition of a child with a disability pursuant to section 79-1117. Transition services shall consist of a coordinated set of activities for a student, designed within an outcome-oriented process, which promotes movement from school to postschool activities, including postsecondary education, vocational training, integrated employment, continuing and adult education, adult services, independent living, and community participation. The coordinated set of activities shall be based upon the individual student's needs, taking into account the student's preferences and interests, and shall include instruction, community experiences, the development of employment and other postschool adult living objectives, and, when appropriate, acquisition of daily living skills and functional vocational evaluation. The transition team shall designate one or more specialized service providers to develop a plan for the student's transition to adult specialized services.

Laws 1991, LB 830, § 25;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1068;

Laws 2019, LB675, § 55;

Laws 2021, LB527, § 1.